Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-216
Testing centers; Board of Regents; control; distribution.

For the promotion and furtherance of the agricultural interests in the different areas of this state, experimental testing centers may be established for the purpose of carrying out a crops-and-soil testing program. Such testing centers shall be under the control and management of the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska and shall be distributed throughout the state in order to determine the effect that variation in soils, rainfall, temperature, growing season, altitude and other factors have in the production of crops in all portions of the state.

Laws 1943, c. 5, § 1, p. 60;

R.S.1943, § 85-216.